Arkansas, session 2025, HB1498.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-63-404(b), concerning the establishment
and operations of military-type canteens and exchanges, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, a
military-type canteen and exchange established or operated under this section
is subject to similar procedures, policies, privileges, limitations, and
restrictions governing the canteens and exchanges of the Army and Air Force
Exchange Service, as the Adjutant General may deem advisable, necessary, or
expedient.
(2)(A) Military-type canteens and exchanges established or operated
under this section shall not sell, trade, exchange, market, or vend
automobiles, household appliances, furniture, building products, motorcycles,
or bicycles.
(B) Military-type canteens and exchanges may contract with one (1) or
more automobile rental agencies to provide leased or rented vehicles for use
by uniformed service members, trainees, and other temporary residents of
military reservations.

*ZRC021*
03-06-2025 09:50:21 ZRC021

As Engrossed: H3/6/25 HB1498
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 12-63-406(a), concerning the inventory and
sales of military-type canteens and exchanges, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Adjutant General, acting for and on behalf of the Arkansas
National Guard, may enter into a contract or agreement with military-focused
nonprofits, military-focused nonprofit foundations, or other entities for the
purchase of normally regarded military-type canteen and exchange inventory
items, subject to the limitations prescribed in § 12-63-404.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 12-63-409 is amended to read as follows:
12-63-409. Military-type canteens and exchanges — Use of funds.
All nonappropriated funds derived from the operation of the Robinson
Maneuver Training Center and the Fort Chaffee Joint Maneuver Training Center
military-type canteens and exchanges under the authority of the Adjutant
General shall be used exclusively for improvements on, to, or for the
Robinson Maneuver Training Center, the Fort Chaffee Joint Maneuver Training
Center, or any other military reservation, armory, or airfield, or for the
general welfare of the units and members of the Arkansas National Guard.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 12-63-410(a), concerning the termination of
of the operation of military-type canteens and exchanges, is amended to read
as follows:
(a) If the Adjutant General deems it to be in the best interest of the
military forces of this state or of the United States, the Adjutant General
may enter into an agreement or agreements with the Army and Air Force
Exchange Service for the institution, maintenance, and operation by the Army
and Air Force Exchange Service of post exchanges on the Robinson Maneuver
Training Center or the Fort Chaffee Joint Maneuver Training Center, or both
military properties and military reservations of the Arkansas National Guard.

/s/Painter






03-06-2025 09:50:21 ZRC021